Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1469.05
Businesses
and organizations; separate segregated political fund; restrictions.

(1) An entity specified in subsection (1)
of section 49-1469 which establishes and administers a separate
segregated political fund:

(a) Shall not make an expenditure to such fund, except that
it may make expenditures and provide personal services for the establishment
and administration of such separate segregated political fund; and

(b) Shall file the reports required by subsection (2) of
section 49-1469 with respect to the expenditures made or personal services
provided for the establishment and administration of such fund but need not
file such reports for the expenditures made from such fund.

(2) If a corporation makes an expenditure to a separate segregated
political fund which is established and administered by an industry, trade,
or professional association,
limited liability company, or limited liability partnership of
which such corporation is a member, such corporation shall not be required
to file the reports required by subsection (2) of section 49-1469.

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 20;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 19.